Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4610
Power to revoke or amend.

A donor may revoke or amend a power of appointment only to the extent that:

(1) the instrument creating the power is revocable by the donor; or

(2) the donor reserves a power of revocation or amendment in the instrument creating the power of appointment.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 33.